Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 124D.81, subdivision 2b, is amended to read: Subd. 2b. Carry forward of funds. Notwithstanding section 16A.28, if a school district or Tribal contract school does not expend the full amount of the American Indian education aid in accordance with the plan in the designated fiscal year, the school district or Tribal contract school may carry forward and expend up to half of the remaining funds in the following fiscal year, and is not subject to an aid reduction if: (1) the district is otherwise following the plan submitted and approved under subdivision 2; (2) the American Indian Parent Advisory Committee for the school is aware of and has approved the carry forward deleted text begin and has concurred withdeleted text end new text begin fornew text end the district's educational offerings extended to American Indian students under section 124D.78; (3) the funds carried over are used in accordance with section 124D.74, subdivision 1; and (4) by April 1, the district reports to the Department of Education American Indian education director the reason the aid was not expended in the designated fiscal year, and describes how the district intends to expend the funds in the following fiscal year. The district must report this information in the form and manner determined by the commissioner.